District of Columbia statutes.
46-353.07

Duties of support enforcement agency.

(a)

In a proceeding under this chapter, a support enforcement agency of the District, upon request:

(1)

Shall provide services to a petitioner residing in a state;

(2)

Shall provide services to a petitioner requesting services through a central authority of a foreign country as described in § 46-351.02(6)(A) or (D); and

(3)

May provide services to a petitioner who is an individual not residing in a state.

(b)

A support enforcement agency of the District that is providing services to the petitioner shall:

(1)

Take all steps necessary to enable an appropriate tribunal of the District, another state, or a foreign country to obtain jurisdiction over the respondent;

(2)

Request an appropriate tribunal to set a date, time, and place for a hearing;

(3)

Make a reasonable effort to obtain all relevant information, including information as to income and property of the parties;

(4)

Within 2 days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after receipt of notice in a record from an initiating, responding, or registering tribunal, send a copy of the notice to the petitioner;

(5)

Within 2 days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after receipt of communication in a record from the respondent or the respondent’s attorney, send a copy of the communication to the petitioner; and

(6)

Notify the petitioner if jurisdiction over the respondent cannot be obtained.

(c)

A support enforcement agency of the District that requests registration of a child-support order in the District for enforcement or for modification shall make reasonable efforts:

(1)

To ensure that the order to be registered is the controlling order; or

(2)

If 2 or more child-support orders exist and the identity of the controlling order has not been determined, to ensure that a request for such a determination is made in a tribunal having jurisdiction to do so.

(d)

A support enforcement agency of the District that requests registration and enforcement of a support order, arrears, or judgment stated in a foreign currency shall convert the amounts stated in the foreign currency into the equivalent amounts in dollars under the applicable official or market exchange rate as publicly reported.

(e)

A support enforcement agency of the District shall issue or request a tribunal of the District to issue a child-support order and an income-withholding order that redirect payment of current support, arrears, and interest if requested to do so by a support enforcement agency of another state pursuant to § 46-353.19.

(f)

This chapter does not create or negate a relationship of attorney and client or other fiduciary relationship between a support enforcement agency or the attorney for the agency and the individual being assisted by the agency.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 307, 63 DCR 222